tr: Astar malzemesi: Kanvas; Pamuk; Suni kürk; Suni deri; Polar; Deri; Keten; File; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Naylon; Polyester; Kauçuk; Saten; Koyun postu; İpek; Süet; Sentetik; Kumaş; Termoplastik poliüretan (TPU); Yün; Diğer
sk-SK: Materiál podšívky: Plátno; Bavlna; Umelá kožušina; Umelá koža; Flís; Koža; Ľan; Sieťovina; Mikrovlákno; Neoprén; Nylon; Polyester; Guma; Satén; Ovčia kožušina; Hodváb; Semiš; Syntetika; Textil; Termoplastický polyuretán (TPU); Vlna; Iné
pt-PT: Material do forro: Lona; Algodão; Pelo sintético; Pele sintética; Polar; Pele; Linho; Malha; Microfibra; Neopreno; Nylon; Poliéster; Borracha; Cetim; Pele de ovelha; Seda; Camurça; Sintético; Têxtil; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Lã; Outro
fr: Matériau de revêtement: Toile; Coton; Fausse fourrure; Similicuir; Polaire; Cuir; Lin; Maille; Microfibre; Néoprène; Nylon; Polyester; Caoutchouc; Satin; Peau lainée; Soie; Daim; Synthétique; Textile; Polyuréthane thermoplastique (TPU); Laine; Autre
hr-HR: Materijal podstave: Platno; Pamuk; Umjetno krzno; Umjetna koža; Flis; Koža; Lan; Mrežica; Mikrovlakna; Neopren; Najlon; Poliester; Guma; Saten; Ovčje krzno; Svila; Antilop; Sintetika; Tekstil; Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Vuna; Ostalo
da: Foringsmateriale: Lærred; Bomuld; Imiteret pels; Imiteret læder; Fleece; Læder; Hør; Mesh; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nylon; Polyester; Gummi; Satin; Lammeskind; Silke; Ruskind; Syntetisk; Tekstil; Termoplastisk polyurethan (TPU); Uld; Andet
ro-RO: Material căptușeală: Pânză; Bumbac; Blană artificială; Piele artificială; Fleece; Piele; In; Plasă; Microfibră; Neopren; Nailon; Poliester; Cauciuc; Satin; Piele de oaie; Mătase; Piele întoarsă; Sintetic; Material textil; Poliuretan termoplastic (TPU); Lână; Altele
sl-SI: Material podloge: Platno; Bombaž; Umetno krzno; Umetno usnje; Flis; Usnje; Lan; Mrežica; Mikrovlakna; Neopren; Najlon; Poliester; Guma; Saten; Shearling; Svila; Semiš; Sintetika; Tekstil; Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Volna; Drugo
zh-CN: 内衬材料: 帆布; 棉; 人造毛皮; 人造皮革; 抓绒; 皮革; 亚麻; 网眼布; 超细纤维; 氯丁橡胶; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 橡胶; 缎面; 羊毛皮; 丝绸; 绒面革; 合成材料; 织物; 热塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 羊毛; 其他
it: Materiale del rivestimento: Tela; Cotone; Pelliccia ecologica; Ecopelle; Pile; Pelle; Lino; Mesh; Microfibra; Neoprene; Nylon; Poliestere; Gomma; Raso; Montone; Seta; Pelle scamosciata; Sintetico; Tessuto; Poliuretano termoplastico (TPU); Lana; Altro
nl: Bekledingsmateriaal: Canvas; Katoen; Imitatiebont; Imitatieleer; Fleece; Leer; Linnen; Mesh; Microvezel; Neopreen; Nylon; Polyester; Rubber; Satijn; Shearling; Zijde; Suède; Synthetisch; Textiel; Thermoplastisch polyurethaan (TPU); Wol; Overige
hu: Bélésanyag: Vászon; Pamut; Műszőrme; Műbőr; Polár; Bőr; Len; Háló; Mikroszálas; Neoprén; Nejlon; Poliészter; Gumi; Szatén; Irha; Selyem; Velúr; Szintetikus; Textil; Hőre lágyuló poliuretán (TPU); Gyapjú; Egyéb
es: Material del forro: Lona; Algodón; Piel sintética; Cuero sintético; Polar; Cuero; Lino; Malla; Microfibra; Neopreno; Nailon; Poliéster; Goma; Satén; Borreguillo; Seda; Gamuza; Sintético; Textil; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Lana; Otro
sv: Fodermaterial: Kanvas; Bomull; Fuskpäls; Konstläder; Fleece; Läder; Linne; Nät; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nylon; Polyester; Gummi; Satin; Fårskinn; Silke; Mocka; Syntetisk; Textil; Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Ull; Övrigt
fi: Vuoren materiaali: Kanvaasi; Puuvilla; Tekoturkis; Keinonahka; Fleece; Nahka; Pellava; Verkko; Mikrokuitu; Neopreeni; Nylon; Polyesteri; Kumi; Satiini; Lampaanturkis; Silkki; Mokka; Synteettinen; Tekstiili; Termoplastinen polyuretaani (TPU); Villa; Muu
zh-TW: 襯裡材質: 帆布; 棉質; 人造皮草; 人造皮革; 刷毛; 皮革; 亞麻; 網眼布; 微纖維; 氯丁橡膠; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 橡膠; 緞面; 羊毛皮; 絲綢; 麂皮; 合成材質; 布料; 熱塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 羊毛; 其他
pl: Materiał wyściółki: Płótno; Bawełna; Sztuczne futro; Sztuczna skóra; Polar; Skóra; Len; Siatka; Mikrofibra; Neopren; Nylon; Poliester; Guma; Satyna; Kożuch; Jedwab; Zamsz; Syntetyk; Materiał tekstylny; Poliuretan termoplastyczny (TPU); Wełna; Inne
de: Futtermaterial: Canvas; Baumwolle; Kunstfell; Kunstleder; Fleece; Leder; Leinen; Mesh; Mikrofaser; Neopren; Nylon; Polyester; Gummi; Satin; Lammfell; Seide; Wildleder; Synthetik; Textil; Thermoplastisches Polyurethan (TPU); Wolle; Sonstige
el: Υλικό επένδυσης: Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι; Οικολογική γούνα; Οικολογικό δέρμα; Φλις; Δέρμα; Λινό; Δίχτυ; Μικροΐνες; Νεοπρένιο; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Καουτσούκ; Σατέν; Shearling; Μετάξι; Καστόρι; Συνθετικό; Ύφασμα; Θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη (TPU); Μαλλί; Άλλο
th: วัสดุซับใน: ผ้าใบ; ผ้าฝ้าย; ขนสัตว์เทียม; หนังเทียม; ผ้าฟลีซ; หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; ตาข่าย; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; นีโอพรีน; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ยาง; ผ้าซาติน; ขนแกะ; ผ้าไหม; หนังกลับ; สังเคราะห์; สิ่งทอ; โพลิยูรีเทนเทอร์โมพลาสติก (TPU); ขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
nb: Foringsmateriale: Lerret; Bomull; Fuskepels; Kunstskinn; Fleece; Skinn; Lin; Netting; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nylon; Polyester; Gummi; Sateng; Saueskinn; Silke; Semsket skinn; Syntetisk; Tekstil; Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Ull; Annet
pt-BR: Forro material: Lona; Algodão; Pele sintética; Couro sintético; Fleece; Couro; Linho; Malha; Microfibra; Neoprene; Nylon; Poliéster; Borracha; Cetim; Pele de ovelha; Seda; Camurça; Sintético; Têxtil; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Lã; Outro
lt-LT: Pamušalo medžiaga: Drobė; Medvilnė; Dirbtinis kailis; Dirbtinė oda; Flisas; Oda; Linas; Tinklinis audinys; Mikropluoštas; Neoprenas; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Guma; Satinas; Avikailis; Šilkas; Zomša; Sintetika; Tekstilė; Termoplastinis poliuretanas (TPU); Vilna; Kita
en: Lining material: Canvas; Cotton; Faux fur; Faux leather; Fleece; Leather; Linen; Mesh; Microfiber; Neoprene; Nylon; Polyester; Rubber; Satin; Shearling; Silk; Suede; Synthetic; Textile; Thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU); Wool; Other
ja: 裏地素材: キャンバス; コットン; フェイクファー; フェイクレザー; フリース; レザー; リネン; メッシュ; マイクロファイバー; ネオプレン; ナイロン; ポリエステル; ラバー; サテン; シアリング; シルク; スエード; 合成素材; テキスタイル; 熱可塑性ポリウレタン (TPU); ウール; その他
cs: Materiál podšívky: Plátno; Bavlna; Umělá kožešina; Umělá kůže; Fleece; Kůže; Len; Síťovina; Mikrovlákno; Neopren; Nylon; Polyester; Guma; Satén; Ovčí kožešina; Hedvábí; Semiš; Syntetika; Textil; Termoplastický polyuretan (TPU); Vlna; Jiné
ko: 안감 소재: 캔버스; 면; 인조 퍼; 인조 가죽; 플리스; 가죽; 리넨; 메시; 극세사; 네오프렌; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 고무; 새틴; 시어링; 실크; 스웨이드; 합성 소재; 직물; 열가소성 폴리우레탄(TPU); 울; 기타
ru: Материал подкладки: Канвас; Хлопок; Искусственный мех; Искусственная кожа; Флис; Кожа; Лен; Сетка; Микрофибра; Неопрен; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Резина; Сатин; Овчина; Шелк; Замша; Синтетика; Текстиль; Термопластичный полиуретан (ТПУ); Шерсть; Другое
vi: Vật liệu lót: Canvas; Cotton; Lông thú giả; Da giả; Nỉ lông; Da; Lanh; Lưới; Microfiber; Neoprene; Nylon; Polyester; Cao su; Satin; Lông cừu; Lụa; Da lộn; Sợi tổng hợp; Vải dệt; Polyurethane nhiệt dẻo (TPU); Len; Khác
bg-BG: Материал на подплатата: Канвас; Памук; Изкуствен косъм; Изкуствена кожа; Полар; Естествена кожа; Лен; Мрежа; Микрофибър; Неопрен; Найлон; Полиестер; Гума; Сатен; Агнешка кожа; Коприна; Велур; Синтетика; Текстил; Термопластичен полиуретан (TPU); Вълна; Други